Hawaii statutes.
§486-84 Civil action. (a) Any person
who violates any requirement imposed under this part shall be liable to the
buyer, in an amount equal to the sum of:

(1) Three times the amount of actual damages
sustained or $1,500, whichever is greater; and

(2) In the case of any successful action to enforce
the foregoing liability, the costs of the action, together with reasonable
attorney fees as determined by the court.

(b) An action to enforce any liability created
under subsection (a) of this section must be brought in a court of competent
jurisdiction without regard to the amount in controversy, within two years from
the date on which the liability occurred. [L 1988, c 156, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next